Hawaii, session 2026, SB882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to effectuate the
title of this Act.
SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended to
conform to the purpose of this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-0892 SB SMA.docx
IIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII

S.B. NO. 882